Wyoming, session 2025, HB0176.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 22-18-111(a) by creating a new
paragraph (vii) and (c)(ii) is amended to read:

22-18-111. Vacancies in other offices; temporary
appointments.
HB0176

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0536

(a) Any vacancy in any other elective office in the
state except representative in congress or the board of
trustees of a school or community college district, shall
be filled by the governing body, or as otherwise provided
in this section, by appointment of a temporary successor.
The person appointed shall serve until a successor for the
remainder of the unexpired term is elected at the next
general election and takes office on the first Monday of
the following January. Provided, if a vacancy in a four
(4) year term of office occurs in the term's second or
subsequent years after the first day for filing an
application for nomination pursuant to W.S. 22-5-209, no
election to fill the vacancy shall be held and the
temporary successor appointed shall serve the remainder of
the unexpired term. The following apply:

(vii) If a vacancy is not filled in accordance
with this subsection, the following shall apply:

(A) Subject to subparagraph (C) of this
paragraph, for a vacancy to be filled under paragraph (i)
or (iii) of this subsection that is not filled within the
HB0176

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0536
time specified in paragraph (i) or subparagraphs (iii)(A)
and (B) of this subsection, the state central committee
shall fill the vacancy by temporary appointment to the
office from the three (3) names submitted under paragraph
(i) or subparagraphs (iii)(A) and (B) of this subsection;

(B) Subject to subparagraph (C) of this
paragraph, for a vacancy to be filled under paragraph (ii)
of this subsection that is not filled within the time
specified in paragraph (ii) of this subsection, the county
central committee shall fill the vacancy by temporary
appointment to the office from the three (3) names
submitted under paragraph (ii) of this subsection;

(C) If the incumbent who has vacated an
office did not represent a political party at the time of
election under W.S. 22-6-120(a)(vii) and if the governor or
county commissioners do not fill the vacancy by appointing
a person within the time specified in this subsection, a
special election shall be held in accordance with W.S.
22-18-109.

(c) For purposes of this section:
HB0176

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0536

(ii) "Qualified to hold the office" means a
person meets all applicable qualifications to be elected to
a public office which are set forth in the United States
and Wyoming constitutions and Wyoming law, as applicable,
on the date of the person's appointment to the public
office. For purposes of this paragraph, a person who meets
all applicable qualifications specified in this paragraph
shall have a non-rebuttable presumption to be qualified to
hold the office.

Section 2. W.S. 22-18-111(a)(vi) is repealed.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0176